Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5656
Commission; officers.

The commission shall annually elect from among its members a chairperson and a vice-chairperson. The commission shall receive assistance from the staff of the office.

Laws 1991, LB 400, § 7;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 730;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 155.